District of Columbia statutes.
12-305

Actions against decedents’ estates.

In an action against the estate of a deceased person, the interval, not exceeding two years, between the death of the deceased and 6 months after the date of the first publication of notice of the appointment of a personal representative under section 20-704 may not be computed as a part of the period within which the action must be brought.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 511, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 202(a), 27 DCR 2155

Section References

This section is referenced in § 12-308.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 12-305.
1973 Ed., § 12-305.